test/src/morphology/N-oho_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôhô - ok : # -m animate noun
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg: ôhô
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl: ôhôwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Loc: ôhôhk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg: ôhisis
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl: ôhôsisak

     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhô
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhô
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôhô
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: otôhôyiw
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhônân
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhônân
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kANiskâw
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     ôhô+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: otôhôyiw

     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhôwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhôwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôhôwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: otôhôyiwa
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhinânak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhônawak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhiwâwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôhôwâwa
     ôhô+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: otôhôyiwa

     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhôsis
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhôsis
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: otôhôsis
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: otôhôsisiyiw
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhisisnân
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhisisnân
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhôsisiwâw
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: otôhôsisiwâw
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: otôhôsisiyiw

     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhôsisak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhôsisak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: otôhôsisa
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: otôhôsisiyiwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhôsisinânak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhôsisnawak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhôsisiwâwak
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: otôhôsisiwâwa
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: otôhôsisiyiwa

     ôhô+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhôhk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhôhk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhôhk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôhôyihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisANânihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhônâhk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     ôhô+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôhôyihk

     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhôsisihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhôsisihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhôsisihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: otôhôssiyihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhôsisnânihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhôssANâh
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhôsiswâwihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhôsiswâwihk
     ôhô+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: otôhôsisiyihk
